California statutes. Vehicle Code
(8) The total expenditures by the service authority for towing and storage of abandoned vehicles during the previous fiscal year.

(d) Each service authority that fails to submit the report required pursuant to subdivision (c) by October 31 of each year shall have its fee pursuant to subdivision (a) suspended for one year commencing on July 1 following the Controller’s determination pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) On or before January 1 annually, the Controller shall review the fiscal yearend reports, submitted by each service authority pursuant to subdivision (c) and due no later than October 31, to determine if fee revenues are being utilized in a manner consistent with the service authority’s approved program. If the Controller determines that the use of the fee revenues is not consistent
 with the service authority’s program as approved by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or that an excess of fee revenues exists, as specified in subdivision (b), the authority to collect the fee shall be suspended for one year pursuant to subdivision (b). If the Controller determines that a service authority has not submitted a fiscal yearend report as required in subdivision (c), the authorization to collect the service fee shall be suspended for one year pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (d). The Controller shall inform the Department of Motor Vehicles on or before January 1 annually, that the authority to collect the fee is suspended. A suspension shall only occur if the service authority has been in existence for at least two full fiscal years and the revenue fee surpluses are in excess of those allowed under this section, the use of the fee revenue is not consistent with the service authority’s approved program, or the required fiscal yearend report has not been submitted by October 31.

(f) On or before January 1, 2010, and biennially thereafter, the service authority shall have a financial audit of the service authority conducted by a qualified independent third party.

(g) The fee imposed by a service authority shall remain in effect only for a period of 10 years from the date that the actual collection of the fee commenced unless the fee is extended pursuant to this subdivision. The fee may be extended in increments of up to 10 years each if the board of supervisors of the county, by a two-thirds vote, and a majority of the cities having a majority of the incorporated population within the county adopt resolutions providing for the extension of the fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 176.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.8.

(a) In addition to any other fees specified in this code and the Revenue and Taxation Code, a fee of three dollars ($3) shall be paid at the time of registration or renewal of registration of every vehicle, except vehicles described in subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1, subject to registration under this code, except those vehicles that are expressly exempted under this code from the payment of registration fees.

(b) In addition to the fee required under subdivision (a), upon
 the implementation of the permanent trailer identification plate program, and as part of the Commercial Vehicle Registration Act of 2001, all commercial motor vehicles subject to Section 9400.1 shall pay a fee of six dollars ($6).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.9.

All fees received by the department pursuant to Section 9250.8 shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. The money deposited in the account pursuant to this section shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure to accomplish the following:

(a) To ensure sufficient support for those peace officer members employed on December 31, 1994, and to support an additional 130 peace officer members of the California Highway Patrol.

(b) To offset the costs of maintaining the uniformed field strength of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1197, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.10.

(a) (1) In addition to any other fees specified in this code and the Revenue and Taxation Code, any additional fees imposed by a service authority for freeway emergencies pursuant to Section 2555 of the Streets and Highways Code shall be paid to the department at the time of registration or renewal of registration of every vehicle, except vehicles described in subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1, subject to registration under this code in the subject counties, except those vehicles that are expressly exempted under this
 code from the payment of registration fees.

(2) In addition to the additional fees imposed for freeway emergencies, and upon the implementation of the permanent trailer identification plate program, and as part of the Commercial Vehicle Registration Act of 2001, all commercial motor vehicles subject to Section 9400.1 registered to an owner with an address in the county that established a service authority under this section, shall pay an additional service fee of two dollars ($2).

(b) After deducting its administrative costs, the department shall distribute the additional fees collected pursuant to subdivision (a) to the authority in the county in which they were collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 826, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.11.

(a) In addition to any other fees specified in this code and the Revenue and Taxation Code, a fee of one dollar ($1) may be imposed by the South Coast Air Quality Management District and shall be paid to the department, upon renewal of registration of any motor vehicle subject to Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code and registered in the south coast district, except any vehicle that is expressly exempted under this code from the payment of registration fees.

(b) Prior to imposing fees pursuant to this section, the south coast district board shall approve the imposition of the fees through the adoption of a resolution by both a majority of the district board and a majority of the district board who are elected officials. After deducting all costs incurred pursuant to this section, the department shall distribute the additional fees collected pursuant to subdivision (a) to the south coast district, which shall use the fees to reduce air pollution from motor vehicles through implementation of Sections 40448.5 and 40448.5.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Any memorandum of understanding reached between the district and a county prior to the imposition of a one dollar ($1) fee by a county shall remain in effect and govern the allocation of the funds generated in that county by that fee.

(d) The South Coast Air Quality Management District shall adopt accounting procedures to ensure that revenues from motor vehicle registration fees are not commingled with other program revenues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 724, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.12.

(a) For purposes of this section, “county” means the City and County of San Francisco.

(b) In addition to any other fees specified in this code and the Revenue and Taxation Code, a fee of four dollars ($4) shall be paid at the time of registration or renewal of registration of every vehicle registered to an address within a county, except those vehicles expressly exempted from payment of registration fees and
 commercial vehicles weighing more than 4,000 pounds, unladen, if all of the following occur:

(1) The county board of supervisors finds both of the following:

(A) That there is traffic congestion within the county that can be alleviated by the operation of public transit and that the cost of funding public transit exceeds the revenues to be collected from a service fee imposed on vehicles.

(B) That the imposition of the additional registration fee will reduce the need for any public transit fare increases during the period that the fee is in effect.

(2) The county board of supervisors adopts an ordinance or resolution imposing the additional registration fee.

(3) The ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to
 paragraph (2) is approved by two-thirds of the voters in the county who voted on the measure.

(c) The fee imposed pursuant to this section shall apply to any original registration occurring on or after the January 1 following the adoption of the ordinance pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and to any renewal of registration with an expiration date on or after that January 1.

(d) After deducting all costs incurred pursuant to this section, the department shall distribute the revenues to the county. The amount of revenues distributed by the department to the county shall be equal to the net amount of revenues received from that county that were derived from the imposition of the additional fees.

(e) Money allocated to the county pursuant to this section shall be expended only to fund programs for the
 provision of public transit, including capital outlay, security, and maintenance costs, and including, but not limited to, removal of graffiti from public transit vehicles and facilities, and to pay the costs of compliance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(f) If public transit fees are increased at any time the additional registration fee authorized by the section is in effect, the fee may not continue to be imposed. This section shall become inoperative on the date those fares are increased and shall be repealed on January 1 next following that date. The board of supervisors shall notify the department of any increase in public transit fares occurring while the additional registration fee is in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 966, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Inoperative on date prescribed in subd. (f).   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.13.

(a) (1) In addition to any other fees specified in this code and the Revenue and Taxation Code, a fee of eighteen dollars ($18) shall be paid at the time of registration or renewal of registration of every vehicle, except vehicles described in subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1, subject to registration under this code, except those vehicles that are expressly exempted under this code from the payment of registration fees.

(2) In addition to the fee
 required under paragraph (1), upon the implementation of the permanent trailer identification plate program, and as part of the Commercial Vehicle Registration Act of 2001 (Chapter 861 of the Statutes of 2000), all commercial motor vehicles subject to Section 9400.1 shall pay a fee of six dollars ($6).

(b) The money realized pursuant to this section shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure to offset the costs of increasing the uniformed field strength of the Department of the California Highway Patrol beyond its 1994 staffing level and those costs associated with maintaining this new level of uniformed field strength and carrying out those duties specified in subdivision (a) of Section 830.2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 756, Sec. 19.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.14.

(a) (1) In addition to any other fees specified in this code and the Revenue and Taxation Code, upon the adoption of a resolution by any county board of supervisors, a fee of one dollar ($1) shall be paid at the time of registration or renewal of registration of every vehicle, except vehicles described in subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1, registered to an address within that county except those expressly exempted from payment of registration fees. The fees, after deduction of the administrative costs incurred by the department in carrying out this section, shall be paid quarterly to the Controller.

(2) (A) If a county has adopted a resolution to impose a one-dollar ($1) fee pursuant to paragraph (1), the county may
 increase the fee specified in paragraph (1) to two dollars ($2) in the same manner as the imposition of the initial fee pursuant to paragraph (1). The two dollars ($2) shall be paid at the time of registration or renewal of registration of a vehicle, and quarterly to the Controller, as provided in paragraph (1).

(B) If a county has not adopted a resolution to impose a one-dollar ($1) fee pursuant to paragraph (1), the county may instead adopt a fee of two dollars ($2) in the manner prescribed in paragraph (1).

(C) A resolution to impose a fee of two dollars ($2) pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) shall be submitted to the department at least six months before the operative date of the fee increase.

(3) In addition to the service fee imposed pursuant to paragraph (1), and upon the implementation of the permanent
 trailer identification plate program, and as part of the Commercial Vehicle Registration Act of 2001 (Chapter 861 of the Statutes of 2000), all commercial motor vehicles subject to Section 9400.1 registered to an owner with an address in the county that established a service authority under this section, shall pay an additional service fee of two dollars ($2).

(4) (A) If a county imposes a service fee of two dollars ($2) by adopting a resolution pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2), the fee specified in paragraph (3) shall be increased to four dollars ($4). The four dollars ($4) shall be paid at the time of registration or renewal of registration of a vehicle, and quarterly to the Controller as provided in paragraph (1).

(B) A resolution to increase the additional service fee from two dollars ($2) to four dollars ($4) pursuant to subparagraph
 (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) shall be submitted to the department at least six months before the operative date of the fee increase.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys paid to the Controller are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for the administrative costs of the Controller, and for disbursement by the Controller to each county that has adopted a resolution pursuant to subdivision (a), based upon the number of vehicles registered, or whose registration is renewed, to an address within that county.

(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, moneys allocated to a county pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be expended exclusively to fund programs that enhance the capacity of local police and prosecutors to deter, investigate, and prosecute vehicle theft crimes. In any county with a
 population of 250,000 or less, the moneys shall be expended exclusively for those vehicle theft crime programs and for the prosecution of crimes involving driving while under the influence of alcohol or drugs, or both, in violation of Section 23152 or 23153, or vehicular manslaughter in violation of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code or subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code, or any combination of those crimes.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “vehicle theft crimes” means the theft of a vehicle, unlawful taking of a vehicle, burglary of a vehicle, or theft of vehicle parts or components.

(d) The moneys collected pursuant to this section shall not be expended to offset a reduction in any other source of funds, nor for any purpose not authorized under this section.

(e) Any funds received by a county before
 January 1, 2000, pursuant to this section, that are not expended to deter, investigate, or prosecute crimes pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be returned to the Controller, for deposit in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. Those funds received by a county shall be expended in accordance with this section.

(f) Each county that adopts a resolution under subdivision (a) shall submit, on or before the 13th day following the end of each quarter, a quarterly expenditure and activity report to the designated statewide Vehicle Theft Investigation and Apprehension Coordinator in the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(g) A county that imposes a fee under subdivision (a) shall issue a fiscal year-end report to the Controller on or before November 30 of each year. The report shall include a detailed accounting of the funds received and expended in the
 immediately preceding fiscal year, including, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The amount of funds received and expended by the county under subdivision (b) for the immediately preceding fiscal year.

(2) The total expenditures by the county under subdivision (c) for the immediately preceding fiscal year.

(3) Details of expenditures made by the county under subdivision (c), including salaries and expenses, purchase of equipment and supplies, and any other expenditures made listed by type with an explanatory comment.

(4) A summary of vehicle theft abatement activities and other vehicle theft programs funded by the fees collected pursuant to this section.

(5) The total number of stolen
 vehicles recovered and the value of those vehicles during the immediately preceding fiscal year.

(6) The total number of vehicles stolen during the immediately preceding fiscal year as compared to the fiscal year before the immediately preceding fiscal year.

(7) Any additional, unexpended fee revenues received under subdivision (b) for the county for the immediately preceding fiscal year.

(h) A county that imposes a fee under subdivision (a) shall post the report described in subdivision (g) on its internet website.

(i) Each county that fails to submit the report required pursuant to subdivision (g) by November 30 of each year shall have the fee suspended by the Controller for one year, commencing on July 1 following the Controller’s determination that
 a county has failed to submit the report.

(j) (1) On or before January 1 of each year, the Controller shall provide to the Department of the California Highway Patrol copies of the year-end reports submitted by the counties under subdivision (g) and, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall review the fiscal year-end reports submitted by each county pursuant to subdivision (g) to determine if fee revenues are being utilized in a manner consistent with this section. If the Controller determines that the use of the fee revenues is not consistent with this section, the Controller shall consult with the participating counties’ designated regional coordinators. If the Controller determines that use of the fee revenues is still not consistent with this section, the authority to collect the fee by that county shall be suspended for one year.

(2) If the Controller determines that a county has not submitted a fiscal year-end report as required in subdivision (g), the authorization to collect the service fee shall be suspended for one year pursuant to subdivision (i).

(3) If the Controller determines that a fee shall be suspended for a county, the Controller shall inform the Department of Motor Vehicles on or before February 1 of each year that the authority to collect a fee for that county is suspended.

(k) On or before January 1 of each year, the Controller shall prepare and post on the Controller’s internet website a revenue and expenditure summary for each participating county that includes all of the following:

(1) The total revenues received by each county.

(2) The total
 expenditures by each county.

(3) The unexpended revenues for each county.

(l) For the purposes of this section, a county-designated regional coordinator is that agency designated by the participating county’s board of supervisors as the agency in control of its countywide vehicle theft apprehension program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 184.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.15.

(a) In addition to any other fees specified in this code, the department shall collect an administrative service fee in the amount authorized under subdivision (b) for each application for registration, renewal of registration, or supplement apportioned registration pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4.

(b) The administrative service fee required to be collected under subdivision (a) shall be at least the amount determined by the department to be
 sufficient to pay membership dues to the association acting as the repository for the International Registration Plan under Article 3 (commencing with Section 8000) of Chapter 4, but may not be more than two dollars ($2) for each application.

(c) The money collected by the department under this section, less the department’s administrative costs in collecting and transmitting the money, shall be available, upon appropriation, to the department for payment to the association described in subdivision (b).

(d) Funds provided to the association under this section shall be used exclusively for the administration and support of reciprocity activities under the International Registration Plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 539, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.16.

(a) In addition to any other fees specified in this code, the Health and Safety Code, and the Revenue and Taxation Code, a surcharge of one dollar ($1) may be imposed by the San Joaquin Valley Unified Air Pollution Control District and shall be paid to the department as follows:

(1) Upon initial registration of any motor vehicle not previously registered in this state that is registered on or after the date the department begins collecting the fee.

(2) Upon renewal of registration of any motor vehicle for which the registration period expires after the date the department begins collecting the fee.

(3) This subdivision applies to any motor vehicle subject to Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, except any vehicle that is expressly exempted under this code from the payment of registration fees. The department shall begin collecting the fee on January 1 of the fiscal year immediately following the date the department receives the request to do so from the San Joaquin Valley Unified Air Pollution Control District Board.

(b) Prior to the adoption of any surcharge pursuant to this subdivision, the San Joaquin Valley Unified Air Pollution Control District board shall approve the imposition of the surcharge through the
 adoption of a resolution, as specified in Section 44225 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(c) The San Joaquin Valley Unified Air Pollution Control District shall pay for the costs identified by the department to establish the fee collection procedure. After deducting the on-going costs incurred by the department in collecting the fees, the department shall deposit the revenue collected pursuant to this section into the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund for allocation to the district. Subdivision (c) of Section 40605 of the Health and Safety Code does not apply to the costs described in this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 483, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.17.

(a) The department shall, if requested by a county air pollution control district, air quality management district, or unified or regional air pollution control district, collect fees established pursuant to Sections 44223 and 44225 of the Health and Safety Code upon the registration or renewal of registration of any motor vehicle registered in the district, except those vehicles which are expressly exempted under this code from the payment of registration fees. 

(b) After deducting all costs incurred pursuant to this section, the department shall distribute the revenues
 to the districts based upon the amount of fees collected from motor vehicles registered within each district.

(c) The department may annually expend for its costs not more than the following percentages of the fees collected pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) Five percent during the first year after the operative date the fee is imposed or increased.

(2) Three percent during the second year after the operative date the fee is imposed or increased.

(3) One percent during any subsequent year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1705, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.18.

(a) The department shall collect the administrative fee established pursuant to Sections 44081 and 44081.6 of the Health and Safety Code upon the renewal of registration or transfer of ownership of any motor vehicle registered in the state.

(b) On a monthly basis, after deducting its reasonable costs, the department shall transmit all revenues, including accrued interest, received pursuant to this section, for deposit in the Vehicle Inspection and Repair Fund, for use by the
 Department of Consumer Affairs pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 44000) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code. Alternatively, the department and the Department of Consumer Affairs may, by interagency agreement, establish a procedure for the Department of Consumer Affairs to reimburse the department for its reasonable costs incurred in collecting the administrative fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 54.2.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.19.

(a) (1) In addition to any other fees specified in this code and the Revenue and Taxation Code, upon the adoption of a resolution pursuant to this subdivision by any county board of supervisors, a fee of one dollar ($1) shall be paid at the time of registration, renewal, or supplemental application for apportioned registration pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4 of every vehicle, except vehicles described in subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1, registered to an address within that county except those expressly exempted from payment of registration fees. The fees, after deduction of the administrative costs incurred by the department in carrying out this section, shall be paid quarterly to the
 Controller.

(2) (A) If a county has adopted a resolution to impose a one-dollar ($1) fee pursuant to paragraph (1), the county may increase the fee specified in paragraph (1) to two dollars ($2) in the same manner as the imposition of the initial fee pursuant to paragraph (1). The two dollars ($2) shall be paid at the time of registration or renewal of registration of a vehicle, and quarterly to the Controller, as provided in paragraph (1).

(B) If a county has not adopted a resolution to impose a one-dollar ($1) fee pursuant to paragraph (1), the county may instead adopt a fee of two dollars ($2) in the manner prescribed in paragraph (1).

(C) A resolution to impose a fee of two dollars ($2) pursuant to
 subparagraph (A) or (B) shall be submitted to the department at least six months prior to the operative date of the fee increase.

(3) In addition to the one-dollar ($1) service fee, and upon the implementation of the permanent trailer identification plate program, and as part of the Commercial Vehicle Registration Act of 2001, all commercial motor vehicles subject to Section 9400.1 registered to an owner with an address in the county that established a service authority under this section, shall pay an additional service fee of two dollars ($2).

(4) (A) If a county imposes a service fee of two dollars ($2) by adopting a resolution pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2),
 the fee specified in paragraph (3) shall be increased to four dollars ($4). The four dollars ($4) shall be paid at the time of registration or renewal of registration of a vehicle, and quarterly to the Controller as provided in paragraph (1).

(B) A resolution adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) shall be submitted to the department at least six months prior to the operative date of the fee.

(5) A resolution adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) shall include findings as to the purpose of, and the need for, imposing the additional registration fee.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money paid to the Controller pursuant to subdivision (a) is continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for disbursement by the Controller to each county that has adopted a resolution pursuant to subdivision (a), based upon the number of vehicles registered, or whose registration is renewed, to an address within that county, or supplemental application for apportioned registration, and for the administrative costs of the Controller incurred under this section.

(c) Money allocated to
 a county pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be expended exclusively to fund programs that enhance the capacity of local law enforcement to provide automated mobile and fixed location fingerprint identification of individuals who may be involved in driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs in violation of Section 23152 or 23153, or vehicular manslaughter in violation of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code or subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code, or any combination of those and other vehicle-related crimes, and other crimes committed while operating a motor vehicle.

(d) The data from a program funded pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be made available by the local law enforcement agency to a local public agency that is required by law to obtain a criminal history background of persons as a condition of employment with that
 local public agency. A local law enforcement agency that provides the data may charge a fee to cover its actual costs in providing that data.

(e) (1) Money collected pursuant to this section shall not be used to offset a reduction in any other source of funds for the purposes authorized under this section.

(2) Funds collected pursuant to this section, upon recommendation of local or regional Remote Access Network Boards to the board of supervisors, shall be used exclusively for the purchase, by competitive bidding procedures, and the operation of equipment that is compatible with the Department of Justice’s Cal-ID master plan, as described in Section 11112.2 of the Penal Code, and the equipment shall interface in a manner that is in compliance with the
 requirement described in the Criminal Justice Information Services, Electronic Fingerprint Transmission Specification, prepared by the Federal Bureau of Investigation and dated August 24, 1995.

(f) Every county that has authorized the collection of the fee pursuant to subdivision (a) shall issue a fiscal yearend report to the Controller on or before November 1 of each year, summarizing all of the following with respect to those fees:

(1) The total revenues received by the county for the fiscal year.

(2) The total expenditures and encumbered funds by the county for the fiscal year. For purposes of this subdivision, “encumbered funds” means funding that is scheduled to be spent pursuant to a determined schedule and for an
 identified purchase consistent with this section.

(3) Any unexpended or unencumbered fee revenues for the county for the fiscal year.

(4) The estimated annual cost of the purchase, operation, and maintenance of automated mobile and fixed location fingerprint equipment, related infrastructure, law enforcement enhancement programs, and personnel created or utilized in accordance with this section for the fiscal year. The listing shall detail the make and model number of the equipment, and include a succinct description of the related infrastructure items, law enforcement enhancement programs, and the classification or title of any personnel.

(5) How the use of the funds benefits the motoring public.

(g) For each county that fails to submit the report required pursuant to subdivision (f) by November 1 of each year, the Controller shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles to suspend the fee for that county imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) for one year.

(h) If any funds received by a county pursuant to subdivision (a) are not expended or encumbered in accordance with this section by the close of the fiscal year in which the funds were received, the Controller shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles to suspend the fee for that county imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) for one year. For purposes of this subdivision, “encumbered funds” means funding that is scheduled to be spent pursuant to a determined schedule and for an identified purchase consistent with this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 292, Sec. 1.   (AB 2393)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9252.

(a) In addition to the registration fee specified in Section 9250 and any weight fee, there shall be paid a service fee of fifteen dollars ($15) for the registration within this state of every vehicle purchased new outside this state or previously registered outside this state. If the vehicle has been registered and operated in this state during the same registration year in which application for registration is made, a fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be paid.

(b) This section
 does not apply to vehicles registered as fleet vehicles under Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4, except upon application for a certificate of ownership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9254.

A service fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be paid to the department for a certificate of ownership issued without registration of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9255.

Upon application for the transfer of the title or any interest of an owner or legal owner in or to a vehicle registered under this code, or for which a certificate of ownership has been issued without registration under Section 4452, other than upon a transfer to a chattel mortgagee and other than upon a transfer to a transferee not required under this code to obtain the issuance to the owner of a new certificate of ownership and registration card, there shall be paid the following fees: (1) For a transfer by the owner of an automobile ormotorcycle $15(2) For a transfer by the owner of a trailer coachor commercial vehicle $15(3) For a transfer by the legal owner $15(4) When an application is presented showing a transfer by boththe owner and legal owner of an automobile ormotorcycle $15(5) When an application is presented showing a transfer by boththe owner and legal owner of a trailer coach or commercialvehicle $15

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 758, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9255.1.

A service fee of two dollars ($2), in addition to other required fees, shall be paid to the department upon the initial issuance of a registration card identifying a motor vehicle of a type included in subdivision (b) of Section 4453. Subsequent transfers of title are exempted from the two-dollar ($2) service fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 856, Sec. 2.   Operative October 1, 1981, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 856.)
-------------------------------------------

9255.2.

(a) In addition to any other fees specified in this code and the Revenue and Taxation Code, a fee of not more than fifty dollars ($50), as determined by the Department of the California Highway Patrol to cover the costs of implementing and conducting the inspection program required under Section 5505, shall be paid to the Department of Motor Vehicles at the time inspection is made for initial registration or transfer of ownership of a vehicle included in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 4453.

(b) The fees collected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. The money deposited in the account shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for distribution as follows:

(1) Not more than three dollars ($3) of each fee collected under subdivision (a) to the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(2) The remainder to the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 670, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9255.3.

Notwithstanding Section 9255, any vehicle transferred pursuant to Section 14607.6 shall be subject to a title transfer fee equal to the department’s actual cost of processing that transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1133, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9255.5.

Upon application for transfer of registration pursuant to Section 5911, a fee as specified in Section 9265 shall be paid to the department in addition to the regular transfer fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

9256.

Upon filing with the department an application for transfer of registration to the chattel mortgagee as provided herein there shall be paid to the department a fee of three dollars ($3) for each vehicle registered under this code described in and subject to the chattel mortgage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1717.)
-------------------------------------------

9257.

Every notice of the installation in a vehicle of a motor vehicle engine or motor required to be filed under Section 4161 shall be accompanied by a filing fee of two dollars ($2).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9257.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a fee of fifty dollars ($50) shall be paid for each temporary permit issued pursuant to Section 4156 when a certificate of compliance is required pursuant to Section 4000.3.

(b) After deducting its administrative costs, the department shall deposit fees collected pursuant to subdivision (a) in the High Polluter Repair or Removal Account in the Vehicle Inspection and Repair Fund.

(c) The department shall not charge a fee pursuant to subdivision (a) if the department is presented at the time the temporary permit is issued with sufficient evidence, as determined by the department, that the owner of the vehicle is an income eligible applicant who had his or her vehicle accepted into the Bureau of Automotive Repair Consumer Assistance Program as established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 44000) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 451, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

9258.

A fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be paid to the department for each one-trip permit issued pursuant to Section 4003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9258.5.

A fee of thirty-five dollars ($35) shall be paid to the department for each one-trip permit issued pursuant to Section 4003.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 625, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9259.

A fee of two dollars ($2) shall be paid for each sticker or device issued under Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4 of Division 3 or for each vehicle in a fleet upon transfer of ownership as provided in Section 8054.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1241, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9259.3.
